Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.210

Purchase of works of art—Procedure.

The Washington state arts commission shall determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of art in consultation with the agency, except where another person or agency is specified under RCW 43.19.455, 28A.335.210, or 28B.10.025, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the directors of the state agencies.

[ 2005 c 36 s 5; 1990 c 33 s 575; 1983 c 204 s 5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.